District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Public Inconvenience Fee Sunset Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 216 of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department of
Public Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C.
Official Code § 34-2202.16), is amended by adding a new subsection (h) to read as follows:
“(h) The Authority shall separately itemize any public inconvenience fee that it passes on
to consumers on the consumer’s bill. To the extent that the Authority charges an increased
amount to consumers to recoup any portion of the public inconvenience fees set forth in


subparagraph (C) section 225.1(c)(1) of Title 24 of the District of Municipal Regulations (24
DCMR § 225.1(c)(1)), that practice shall cease as of October 1, 2030.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).